Hawaii statutes.
[§23-93] Review for 2020 and every fifth
year thereafter. (a) The credits, exclusions, and deductions under the
income tax and financial institutions tax listed in subsection (c) shall be
reviewed in 2020 and every fifth year thereafter.

(b) The auditor shall submit the findings and
recommendations of the reviews to the legislature and governor at least twenty
days prior to the convening of the immediately following regular session.

(c) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Section 235-7.3--Exclusion of royalties and other
income derived from a patent, copyright, or trade secret of a qualified high
technology business;

(2) Section 235-9.5--Exclusion for income and
proceeds from stock options or stocks of a qualified high technology business
or a holding company for a qualified high technology business;

(3) Sections 235-17.5 and 241-4.4--Credit for capital
infrastructure costs;

(4) Sections 235-110.7 and 241-4.5--Credit for
capital goods used by a trade or business;

(5) Section 235-110.91--Credit for research activity;

(6) Section 235-110.3--Credit for ethanol facility;
and

(7) Section 241-3.5--Deduction for adjusted eligible
net income of an international banking facility. [L 2016, c 245, pt of §2]

Note

Section 235-110.3, referred to in subsection (c)(6), is
repealed.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next